Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201244-4224
Pool administrator; duties.

The pool administrator shall:

(1) Perform all eligibility verification functions relating
to the pool;

(2) Establish a premium billing procedure for collection of
premiums from covered individuals on a periodic basis as determined by the
board;

(3) Perform all necessary functions to assure timely payment
of benefits to covered individuals, including:

(a) Making available information relating to the proper manner
of submitting a claim for benefits to the pool and distributing forms upon
which submission shall be made; and

(b) Evaluating the eligibility of each claim for payment by
the pool;

(4) Submit regular reports to the board regarding the operation
of the pool. The frequency, content, and form of the reports shall be determined
by the board;

(5) Following the close of each calendar year, report such
income and expense items as directed by the board to the board and the department
on a form prescribed by the director; and

(6) Be paid as provided in the plan of operation for its expenses
incurred in the performance of its services to the pool.

Laws 1985, LB 391, § 24;

Laws 2000, LB 1253, § 26;

Laws 2011, LB73, § 5.